South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3089.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 3, Chapter 7, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-7-395.  Hospitals, healthcare facilities, and other medical providers who have provided treatment or another service to an insured patient for a personal injury must initiate the claim's process with the patient's primary health insurer within thirty days of providing the treatment or service. Failure to submit the claim in accordance with this section constitutes a forfeiture of the provider's right to reimbursement. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a provider from seeking reimbursement from Medicare or Medicaid as permissible by law. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----